Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1083.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 9, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1261.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1261.01. Lighted home address device; reasonable restrictions; fees and costs A. Notwithstanding any provision in the condominium documents, an association shall not prohibit the installation or use of a lighted home address device that does the following: 1. Provides a lighted display of the house number. 2. Flashes when activated to signal the location of an emergency. 3. Is visible from the street. 4. Has a low-light adjustment. B. An association may adopt reasonable rules regarding the placement of a lighted home address device if those rules do not prevent the installation, defeat the purpose or impair the functioning, restrict the use or adversely affect the cost or efficiency of the device. The association may apply reasonable lighting restrictions and the device shall comply with any municipal lighting ordinance. C. Notwithstanding any provision of the condominium documents, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to any party who substantially prevails in an action against the board of directors of the association for a violation of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 33, chapter 16, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1816.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1816.01. Lighted home address device; reasonable restrictions; fees and costs A. Notwithstanding any provision in the community documents, an association shall not prohibit the installation or use of a lighted home address device that does the following: 1. Provides a lighted display of the house number. 2. Flashes when activated to signal the location of an emergency. 3. Is visible from the street. 4. Has a low-light adjustment. B. An association may adopt reasonable rules regarding the placement of a lighted home address device if those rules do not prevent the installation, defeat the purpose or impair the functioning, restrict the use or adversely affect the cost or efficiency of the device. The association may apply reasonable lighting restrictions and the device shall comply with any municipal lighting ordinance. C. Notwithstanding any provision of the community documents, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to any party who substantially prevails in an action against the board of directors of the association for a violation of this section. END_STATUTE